Utah statutes.
62A-6-107.   Petition for order authorizing sterilization.

A petition for an order authorizing sterilization may be filed by a person who desires sterilization, or by his parent, spouse, guardian, custodian, or other interested party.  The court shall adjudicate the petition for sterilization in accordance with Section 62A-6-108.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1988 General Session

